Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB475.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 823. Dialysis centers.(a) Ratios.--A facility in this Commonwealth that is licensed by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services offering dialysis services on an inpatient or outpatient basis, whether or not owned by a hospital or the Commonwealth, shall maintain a minimum of one dialysis caregiver for every four 123456789101112131415161718192021 patients actively receiving dialysis services, and shall provide sufficient care to meet the needs of each patient.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Dialysis caregiver." Any of the following individuals trained in dialysis procedures and direct patient care during treatment, including initiation of treatment, termination of treatment and monitoring vital signs:(1) A physician.(2) A physician assistant.(3) A nurse practitioner.(4) A registered nurse.(5) A licensed practical nurse.(6) A dialysis technician."Dialysis services." Hemodialysis or peritoneal dialysis used to treat end-stage renal disease.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0475PN0458 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718